Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8440. WEST TRAVIS COUNTY MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT NO. 3

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8440.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means West Travis County Municipal Utility District No. 3.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 8440.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Travis County created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 8440.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The creation of the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 8440.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 3, Chapter 1212, Acts of the 71st Legislature, Regular Session, 1989, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter H, Chapter 54, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure. A mistake in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, or validity;

(2) the district's right to impose a tax; or

(3) the legality or operation of the district or its governing body.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 8440.005. APPLICATION OF CONDITIONS TO CREATION. The enactment of Chapter 1212, Acts of the 71st Legislature, Regular Session, 1989, did not affect conditions to the consent of the creation of the district imposed by any jurisdiction in which the district is located.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8440.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 8440.052. ELECTION DATE. The district shall hold an election to elect the appropriate number of directors on the uniform election date prescribed by Section 41.001, Election Code, in November of each even-numbered year.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 655 (S.B. 2243), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8440.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The district has the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties:

(1) provided by general law applicable to a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49, 50, and 54, Water Code;

(2) relating to a road district or road utility district created under Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution; and

(3) relating to the provision of potable and nonpotable water to the residents and businesses of Travis and Hays Counties, including the construction, acquisition, operation, and maintenance of a supply and distribution facility or system.

(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), the district may not construct, acquire, operate, or maintain a toll road.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 655 (S.B. 2243), Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 2017.